Utah statutes.
17-16a-12.   Rescission of prohibited transaction.
If any transaction is entered into in connection with a violation of Section
17-16a-6, the county may rescind or void any contract or subcontract entered
into pursuant to that transaction without returning any part of the
consideration received by the county.
